Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2556.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 75 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a section to read:§ 3118. Automated road safety monitoring systems.(a) Authorization.--(1) A municipality, after passage of an ordinance, is authorized to use an automated road safety monitoring system approved by the department to prosecute enforceable violations in a school zone.(2) A municipality that uses an automated road safety monitoring system under paragraph (1) may enter into a contract with an entity, including the manufacturer or vendor of automated road safety monitoring systems or other person to implement, administer, operate or otherwise conduct the 12345678910111213141516171819 issuance, processing and the collection of citations and fines.(b) Owner liability.--Except as provided under subsection (e), the registered owner of the motor vehicle shall be liable for the penalty imposed under this section.(c) Notification of violation and penalty.--(1) A fine under this section shall be $40.(2) For the first 30 days after an automated road safety monitoring system becomes operational in a municipality, the municipality may send a written warning to the registered owner of a motor vehicle for the purposes of education in lieu of enforcement through a fine.(3) An enforceable violation issued by a municipality may not be:(i) Made part of the operating record of the individual upon whom the liability is imposed.(ii) A conviction of a moving violation under Subchapter B of Chapter 33 (relating to right-of-way) and Subchapter C of Chapter 35 (relating to rights and duties of pedestrians).(4) The following apply to the notification of an enforceable violation:(i) Notification from a municipality that authorizes the use of an automated road safety monitoring system shall include a notice of an enforceable violation to the registered owner of a motor vehicle that is identified in photographs or videos produced by an automated road safety monitoring system as evidence of an enforceable violation.(ii) A rebuttable presumption exists that the 20260HB2556PN3466 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 registered owner of a motor vehicle was the driver of the motor vehicle when the citation for an enforceable violation was issued and notice delivered as provided in this section.(iii) The notice of violation required under subparagraph (i) shall include:(A) A copy of the photographs or video produced by the automated road safety monitoring system and any other data showing the motor vehicle in the process of an enforceable violation.(B) The registration number and state of issuance of the motor vehicle. (C) The name and address of the registered owner of the motor vehicle. (D) The date, time and location of the alleged enforceable violation.(E) The specific enforceable violation charged.(F) Instructions for payment of the fine imposed.(G) A signed statement by a police officer or trained technician employed by the municipality that, based on the inspection of the recorded image, the motor vehicle was being operated during the commission of an enforceable violation.(H) Instructions on how to appeal the citation and to obtain a hearing.(I) An affidavit form approved by the police officer or trained technician employed by the municipality for the purposes of making an appeal.(iv) In the case of an enforceable violation 20260HB2556PN3466 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 involving a motor vehicle registered in this Commonwealth, the notice shall be mailed within 30 days of the enforceable violation to the address of the registered owner of the motor vehicle.(v) If a motor vehicle is registered under the laws of another state or country, the notice shall be mailed within 45 days after obtaining the name and address of the registered owner of the motor vehicle. If the address is unavailable, it shall be sufficient to mail the notice to the official in the state or country that has charge of the registration of the motor vehicle.(vi) If the registered owner of a motor vehicle involved in a violation is engaged in the business of leasing or renting motor vehicles, the registered owner remains liable for payment of any fine imposed under this section even if the registered owner was not driving the motor vehicle, but may obtain payment from the lessor or renter of the motor vehicle driving the motor vehicle at the time the enforceable violation occurred and forward the payment to the state or municipality imposing the civil penalty.(vii) The notice shall be sent by first class mail. A manual or automatic record of mailing processed by or on behalf of the municipal agent in the ordinary course of business shall be prima facie evidence and shall be admitted as evidence in any judicial or administrative proceeding as to the facts.(viii) A registered owner of a motor vehicle involved in a violation may appeal the violation as to matters of law and fact to the court of common pleas in 20260HB2556PN3466 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the county where the alleged violation occurred. The appeal shall be made not later than 30 days after the date on which the notice of violation was mailed. The registered owner of the motor vehicle may assert in an appeal that a notice served by first class mail or other mail delivery service was not actually delivered. The appeal shall be a de novo hearing.(d) Certificate as evidence.--A certificate, or a facsimile of a certificate, based upon inspection of recorded images produced by an automated road safety monitoring system and sworn to or affirmed by a police officer or trained technician employed by the municipality shall be prima facie evidence of the facts contained in it. The municipality must include a written statement that the automated road safety monitoring system was operating correctly at the time of the alleged violation. A recorded image evidencing an enforceable violation shall be admissible in any judicial or administrative proceeding to adjudicate the liability for the violation.(e) Exemptions.--A registered owner of a motor vehicle shall not be liable for a violation under this section if the enforceable violation was:(1) necessary to allow the passage of an emergency vehicle;(2) incurred while participating in a funeral procession;(3) incurred during a period of time in which the motor vehicle was reported to the police department of any state, city or town as having been stolen and had not been recovered before the time the enforceable violation occurred; or(4) necessary to comply with any other law or regulation 20260HB2556PN3466 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 governing the operation of a motor vehicle.(f) Signage and community notice.--(1) A municipality that authorizes the use of an automated road safety monitoring system shall install at each location of an automated road safety monitoring system an unobstructed sign notifying the public that an automated road safety monitoring system is in use.(2) A municipality that authorizes the use of an automated road safety monitoring system shall make a public announcement and conduct a public awareness campaign of its use of automated road safety monitoring systems beginning not less than 30 days before the first automated road safety monitoring system is put into use.(3) A municipality may install but not activate automated road safety monitoring systems during the 30-day time period under paragraph (2).(g) Reporting.--(1) Annually, not later than December 1, a municipality that authorizes the use of an automated road safety monitoring system shall transmit a report to the department that details each automated road safety monitoring system located in the municipality. The report shall include:(i) A list of the locations of each automated road safety monitoring system in the municipality.(ii) An analysis of the nexus between public safety and each location's automated road safety monitoring system.(iii) The number of fines and warnings issued for enforceable violations under subsection (c).(iv) The total amount of fines collected during the 20260HB2556PN3466 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 year.(v) Crash data, to the extent available, at each separate location of an automated road safety monitoring system.(vi) The total number of pedestrians and other road users present in the photographs or other recorded evidence for all camera-enforceable violations for which fines and warnings were issued during the one-year period.(2) The department shall post all reports received on the department's publicly accessible Internet website.(h) Compensation to manufacturer or vendor.--Compensation paid to a manufacturer or vendor of an automated road safety monitoring system shall be based on the value of the equipment and services provided or rendered in support of the automated road safety monitoring system and may not be based on the number of enforceable violations issued or a portion or percentage of the fine generated by the citations.(i) Photographs taken.--(1) Photographs and other recorded evidence taken by an automated road safety monitoring system shall:(i) Be destroyed not more than 48 hours after the final disposition of an enforceable violation.(ii) Not be discoverable in any judicial or administrative proceeding, other than a proceeding held pursuant to this section, without a court order. A photograph or other recorded evidence taken pursuant to this section shall not be admissible in any judicial or administrative proceeding, other than in a proceeding to adjudicate liability for a violation under this section, 20260HB2556PN3466 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 without a court order.(iii) Only record enforceable violations and may not be used for any other surveillance purposes. The restrictions under this subparagraph may not preclude a court of competent jurisdiction from issuing an order directing that the information be provided to law enforcement officials if the information is reasonably described and is requested solely in connection with a criminal law enforcement action.(iv) Not be utilized to take a frontal view photograph of a motor vehicle committing an enforceable violation. A frontal view photograph of a motor vehicle committing an enforceable violation taken by an automated road safety monitoring system shall not be discoverable or admissible in any judicial or administrative proceeding and shall not be used as the basis for an enforceable violation under this section. To the extent practicable, additional efforts shall be made to ensure that photographs produced by an automated road safety monitoring system do not identify the motor vehicle operator, the passengers or the contents of the motor vehicle. A notice of violation issued may not be dismissed solely because a photograph or photographs allowed for the identification of the motor vehicle operator, the passengers or the contents of the motor vehicle, if the municipality has made a reasonable effort to comply with this subparagraph.(v) Blur any facial image of a pedestrian or other road user captured by the automated road safety monitoring system prior to uploading or otherwise sending 20260HB2556PN3466 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 or transmitting the photograph or other recorded evidence to a city, county or municipality or a municipal agent.(2) A municipality or a manufacturer or vendor of an automated road safety monitoring system may not use, disclose, sell or permit access to data collected by an automated road safety monitoring system, except as necessary to process enforceable violations in accordance with this section.(3) Photographs and other personal identifying information collected by a municipality under this section shall not be a public record.(j) Use of revenue.--A municipality that authorizes the use of automated road safety monitoring systems under this section shall use the revenue generated to pay for administration costs associated with this section and fund road safety projects with the highest potential to reduce vulnerable road user injuries and fatalities, including improvements to access and safety for road users with mobility, sight or other disabilities.(k) Rules and regulations.--The department shall issue rules and promulgate regulations necessary to implement this section.(l) Construction.--Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit a law enforcement officer from issuing a notice of traffic violation to a person in control of a motor vehicle at the time a violation occurs.(m) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Automated road safety monitoring system." A n automated motor vehicle sensor device that produces digital photographs or video of a motor vehicle that commits a violation at the 20260HB2556PN3466 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 location where the automated motor vehicle sensor device is located."Enforceable violations." Any of the following violations of traffic law or regulation:(1) Failure to stop for a stop sign under section 3323 (relating to stop signs and yield signs).(2) Failure to yield to pedestrian in a crosswalk under section 3542 (relating to right-of-way of pedestrians in crosswalks)."Municipal agent." The entity or person contracted by a city, county or municipality to implement, administer or otherwise conduct the issuance, processing and collection of citations and fines of enforceable violations under this section.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260HB2556PN3466 - 10 - 123456789101112131415